Hawaii statutes.
§291-52.6 Replacement of a removable windshield
placard or identification card. A removable windshield placard, temporary
removable windshield placard, or identification card shall be replaced upon:

(1) Submittal to the issuing agency of a completed application
for a removable windshield placard, temporary removable windshield placard, or
identification card to the issuing agency; and

(2) Payment of a fee. [L 2001, c 297, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 30, §6; am L 2006, c 269, §4; am
L 2007, c 77, §3; am L 2010, c 141, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next